Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2348XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 225 Section 1. Section 479B.14, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The commission shall not grant an exclusive right to 3 any pipeline company to construct, maintain, or operate its 4 pipeline along, over, or across any public or private highway, 5 grounds, waters, or streams. The commission shall not grant 6 a permit for longer than twenty-five years. The commission 7 shall not renew a permit granted to a pipeline that transports 8 liquefied carbon dioxide and no pipeline that transports 9 liquefied carbon dioxide shall be permitted to operate for 10 longer than twenty-five years. 11